District of Columbia statutes.
5-119.17

Use of property as evidence.

If any property or money placed in the custody of the Property Clerk shall be desired as evidence in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, such property shall be delivered to any officer who shall present an order to that effect from such Court; but such property shall not be retained in the Court, but shall be returned to the Property Clerk, to be disposed of according to the provisions of this chapter.

R.S., D.C., § 423

History

1981 Ed., § 4-168.
1973 Ed., § 4-166.

Prior Codifications

The Police Court of the District of Columbia and the Municipal Court for the District of Columbia were consolidated by the Act of April 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 270, § 1. The Act of July 8, 1963, § 1, substituted “District of Columbia Court of General Sessions” for “Municipal Court for the District of Columbia.” The Act of July 29, 1970, Pub. L. 91-358, § 155(a), substituted “Superior Court of the District of Columbia” for “District of Columbia Court of General Sessions.”.

References in Text